Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1110.05
Accounting division assessment payments; procedure.

The state agencies, boards, and commissions shall make the accounting division assessment payments to the Accounting Division Revolving Fund pursuant to sections 81-1110.03 and 81-1110.04 to the Department of Administrative Services no later than August 1 of each year, or in four equal payments to be made no later than August 1, October 1, February 1, and April 1 of each year, at the discretion of the Accounting Administrator of the Department of Administrative Services.

Laws 1995, LB 325, § 3.